District of Columbia statutes.
4-1303.74

Implementation plan.

(a)

Within 90 days of April 23, 2013, the Agency shall develop an implementation plan for the dissemination of the Statements of Rights and Responsibilities and a mechanism for receiving and handling complaints or concerns made by youth or on behalf of youth and provide a mechanism to resolve issues related to the youth’s care, placement, and services through the Agency.

(b)

The Agency shall have the following responsibilities regarding the implementation of this part:

(1)

Investigate and attempt to promptly resolve concerns made by youth or on behalf of youth;

(2)

Document the number, general sources and origins, and nature of the communication;

(3)

Beginning January 31, 2014, and every January 31st thereafter, through the Director, make available to the Council a report containing data collected over the course of the prior year that includes the following information:

(A)

The number of contacts made to the Agency by telephone, website address, or otherwise;

(B)

The number of concerns made, including the type and general sources of those concerns;

(C)

The number of investigations performed;

(D)

The number of pending concerns; and

(E)

The trends and issues that arose in the course of investigating concerns and outcomes of the investigations conducted; and

(4)

Post the report required by paragraph (3) of this subsection on the Agency’s website so that it is readily available to the public.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title III-C, § 374
as added Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-276, § 2, 60 DCR 2060
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-274 added this section.